Georgia, session 2025_26, HB469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'True Campus Safety Act.'
SECTION 2.
Part 3 of Article 4 of Chapter 11 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to carrying and possession of firearms, is amended by repealing and reserving
paragraph (6) of subsection (c) of Code Section 16-11-127.1, relating to carrying weapons
within school safety zones, at school functions, or on a bus or other transportation furnished
by a school.
H. B. 469
- 1 -

LC 61 0076
SECTION 3.
Said part is further amended by repealing and reserving Code Section 16-11-130.1, relating
to allowing personnel to carry weapons within certain school safety zones and at school
functions.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 469
- 2 -